Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
205

LAND USE
COMMISSION

Part I. Generally

Section

205-1 Establishment of the commission

205-2 Districting and classification of lands

205-3 Retention of district boundaries

205-3.1 Amendments to district boundaries

205-3.5 Reclassification of land contiguous to an
agricultural

district; approval conditions

205-4 Amendments to district boundaries
involving land areas

greater than fifteen acres

205-4.1 Fees

205-4.5 Permissible uses within the agricultural
districts

205-4.6 Private
restrictions on agricultural uses and activities;

not allowed

205-5 Zoning

205-5.1 to 5.3 Repealed

205-6 Special permit

205-7 Adoption, amendment or repeal of rules

205-8 Nonconforming uses

205-9 to 11 Repealed

205-12 Enforcement

205-13 Penalty for violation

205-14 Repealed

205-15 Conflict

205-16 Compliance with the Hawaii state plan

205-16.1, 16.2 Repealed

205-17 Land use commission decision-making
criteria

205-18 Periodic review of districts

205-19 Contested cases

Part II. Shoreline Setbacks

205-31 to 37 Repealed

Part III. Important Agricultural Lands

205-41 Declaration of policy

205-42 Important agricultural lands; definition
and

objectives

205-43 Important agricultural lands; policies

205-44 Standards and criteria for the
identification of

important agricultural lands

205-44.5 Important agricultural lands; public lands

205-45 Petition by farmer or landowner

205-45.5 Important agricultural land; farm
dwellings and

employee housing

205-46 Incentives for important agricultural
lands

205-46.5 Agricultural processing facilities;
permits; priority

205-47 Identification of important agricultural lands;

county process

205-48 Receipt of maps of eligible important
agricultural

lands; land use commission

205-49 Designation of important agricultural
lands;

adoption of important agricultural lands
maps

205-50 Standards and criteria for the
reclassification or

rezoning of important agricultural lands

205-51 Important agricultural lands; county
ordinances

205-52 Periodic review and amendment of important
agricultural

lands maps

Note

Prior law: L 1961, c 187.

Acquisition of important agricultural lands owned by the
Galbraith Estate; department of land and natural resources powers, etc. L
2008, c 234, §§8 to 10.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §11.

Cross References

Acquisition of important agricultural lands, see §§163D-31 to
163D-33.

Private agricultural parks, see chapter 169.

Law Journals and Reviews

Maha‘ulepu v. Land Use Commission: A Symbol of Change;
Hawaii's Land Use Law Allows Golf Course Development on Prime Agricultural Land
by Special Use Permit. 13 UH L. Rev. 205.

Honolulu's Ohana Zoning Law: To Ohana or Not to Ohana. 13
UH L. Rev. 505.

The Lum Court, Land Use, and the Environment: A Survey of
Hawai‘i Case Law 1983 to 1991. 14 UH L. Rev. 119.

Residential Use of Hawai‘i's Conservation District. 14 UH L.
Rev. 633.

Dolan v. City of Tigard: Individual Property Rights v. Land
Management Systems. 17 UH L. Rev. 193.

Is Agricultural Land in Hawai‘i "Ripe" for a
Takings Analysis? 24 UH L. Rev. 121 (2001).

"Urban Type Residential Communities in the Guise of
Agricultural Subdivisions:" Addressing an Impermissible Use of Hawai‘i's
Agricultural District. 25 UH L. Rev. 199 (2002).

Avoiding the Next Hokuli‘a: The Debate over Hawai‘i's
Agricultural Subdivisions. 27 UH L. Rev. 441 (2005).

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai‘i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

A Self-Executing Article XI, Section 9--The Door For a Bivens
Action for Environmental Rights? 34 UH L. Rev. 187 (2012).

Demolition of Native Rights and Self Determination: Act 55's
Devastating Impact through the Development of Hawaii's Public Lands. 35 UH L.
Rev. 297 (2013).

The (Somewhat) False Hope of Comprehensive Planning. 37 UH
L. Rev. 39 (2015).

Case Notes

Religious Land Use and Institutionalized Persons Act of 2000,
assuming it was constitutional, did not facially invalidate Hawaii's land use
law. 229 F. Supp. 2d 1056 (2002).

Article XI, §9 of the Hawaii constitution is self-executing,
and §205-12 imposes "reasonable limitations and regulations" that
were applicable to the case which allowed the private right of action to
enforce this chapter. 123 H. 391, 235 P.3d 1103 (2010).

Charter school failed to establish that community
association's claim under this chapter was moot, and even if the case was moot,
the public interest exception applied as (1) appeals court ruling that there
was no private right of action under this chapter injected the requisite degree
of public concern; (2) public officials needed guidance as to whether private
citizens have a private right of action to enforce this chapter; and (3) given
the volume of land in this State and the frequency with which issues relating
to this chapter have been litigated, the question of private party enforcement
was likely to recur in the future. 123 H. 391, 235 P.3d 1103 (2010).

In the circumstances of the case, article XI, §9 of the Hawaii
constitution created a private right of action to enforce this chapter, and the
legislature confirmed the existence of that right of action by enacting
§607-25, which allows for the recovery of attorneys' fees in such actions. 123
H. 391, 235 P.3d 1103 (2010).

This chapter is a law relating to environmental quality
within the meaning of article XI, §9 of the Hawaii constitution. 123 H. 391,
235 P.3d 1103 (2010).

As no private cause of action exists to enforce this chapter,
appellants lacked standing to prosecute their claim under this chapter against
landowner and circuit court lacked subject matter jurisdiction to consider this
claim. 119 H. 164 (App.), 194 P.3d 1126 (2008).

Provisions of chapter provide authority to issue special use
permits for golf courses on prime agricultural lands. 71 H. 332, 790 P.2d 906.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next